Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-2] Definitions. When used in
this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrator" means the
administrator of the Hawaii emergency management agency established by section 127A-3.

"Agency" means the Hawaii emergency
management agency established by section 127A-3.

"Council" means the Hawaii advisory
council on emergency management as established by section 127A-4.

"County" means the city and county of
Honolulu, and the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui; provided that the county
of Maui shall include the county of Kalawao for the purposes of this chapter.

"County emergency management agency"
means a county-level entity responsible for emergency management within the
respective counties as established in section 127A-5.

"Critical infrastructure" means those
systems, facilities, and assets, whether physical or virtual, so vital to a
county, the State, or the nation that the incapacity or destruction of such
systems, facilities, or assets would have a debilitating impact on national,
state, or county security; economic security; public health or safety; or any
combination of those matters.

"Director" means the director of the
Hawaii emergency management agency established by section 127A-3, and who is
the same as the adjutant general as provided in section 26-21.

"Disaster" means any emergency, or
imminent threat thereof, which results or may likely result in loss of life or
property and requires, or may require, assistance from other counties or states
or from the federal government.

"Disaster relief" means any physical
or financial assistance provided to individuals or areas in the aftermath of an
emergency or disaster.

"Emergency" means any occurrence, or
imminent threat thereof, which results or may likely result in substantial
injury or harm to the population or substantial damage to or loss of property.

"Emergency management" means a comprehensive integrated system at all levels of
government, and also in the private sector, which develops and maintains an
effective capability to prevent, prepare for, respond to, mitigate, and recover
from emergencies or disasters.

"Emergency management functions" mean
those tasks required to prepare for and carry out actions to prevent, prepare
for, respond to, mitigate, and recover from emergencies and disasters, and
includes management of resources, personnel, and facilities and administration
of economic controls as needed to provide relief in anticipation of, during, or
after emergencies or disasters.

"Emergency period" means the dates
covered by a proclamation issued by the governor declaring a state of emergency
or by a mayor declaring a local state of emergency.

"Evacuation" means the immediate and
rapid movement of individuals and animals away from the threat or actual
occurrence of any hazard, emergency, or disaster, and includes vertical
evacuation, which is moving to a higher floor or higher ground in order to gain
safety above the height of expected inundation by water as recommended by the
county emergency management agency.

"Facilities", except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, includes any infrastructure, buildings and other
structures, shelters, land, roads, highways, thoroughfares, walks, roadways,
bridges, public rights of way, and any appurtenant facilities, structures, and
materials.

"Hazard" means an event or condition
of the physical environment that results or may likely result in damage to
property or injuries or death to individuals and which may result in an
emergency or disaster.

"Laws" includes ordinances, rules,
regulations, and orders prescribed under federal, state, or county laws or
ordinances and having the force and effect of law.

"Local state of emergency" means the
occurrence in any part of a county that requires efforts by the county
government to save lives, and to protect property, public health, welfare, or
safety in the event of an emergency or disaster, or to reduce the threat of an
emergency or disaster.

"Materials" includes medicines,
supplies, products, commodities, articles, equipment, machinery, and component
parts.

"Necessary" means and refers to such
means, measures, or other actions or determinations as are required to be taken
in the opinion of the governor or governor's authorized representative or a
mayor or the mayor's authorized representative.

"State of emergency" means an
occurrence in any part of the State that requires efforts by state government
to protect property, public health, welfare, or safety in the event of an
emergency or disaster, or to reduce the threat of an emergency or disaster, or
to supplement the local efforts of the county.

"States" include the several states,
the District of Columbia, and the possessions of the United States, and also
includes the State of Hawaii, and to the extent authorized by or under federal
law, foreign countries and their provinces and states.

"Traffic control" includes plans,
regulations, devices, and actions for the control of traffic to provide for the
rapid and safe movement or evacuation of individuals, vehicles, and materials
for emergency management, and for the movement and cessation of movement of any
pedestrians and vehicular traffic during, before, and after emergencies and
disasters, emergency management exercises and training, or other emergency
management actions or activities. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next